New York, session 2025-2026, S2240.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 510 of the judiciary law, as amended by chapter 86 2 of the laws of 1995, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 510. Qualifications. [In order to] To qualify as a juror, a person 4 must: 5 1. Be a citizen of the United States, and a resident of the county. 6 2. Be not less than eighteen years of age. 7 3. [Not have been convicted of a felony. 8 4.] Be able to understand and communicate in the English language. 9 § 2. Section 517 of the judiciary law is amended by adding a new 10 subdivision (d) to read as follows: 11 (d) The jury service of any person serving a term of incarceration for 12 a felony conviction shall be excused while the person is incarcerated 13 for such felony. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05843-06-5